Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 6. Enforcement and Penalties.

Sec. 34.45.450.
Enforcement.

The department may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enforce AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Sec. 34.45.460.
Interstate agreements and cooperation.

The department may enter into agreements with other states to exchange information needed to enable this or another state to audit or otherwise determine unclaimed personal property that this state or another state may be entitled to subject to a claim of custody. The department may, by regulation, require the reporting of information needed to enable compliance with agreements made under this section, and prescribe the form for the report.

To avoid conflicts between the department’s procedures and the procedures in other jurisdictions that enact the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act, the department, so far as is consistent with the purposes, policies, and provisions of this chapter, shall, before adopting, amending, or repealing regulations, advise and consult with administrators in other jurisdictions that enact, substantially, the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act, and shall take into consideration the rules of administrators in other jurisdictions that enact the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act.

The department may join with other states to seek enforcement of AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

against a person who is or may be holding property reportable under AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.430

.

At the request of another state, the attorney general of this state may bring an action in the name of the other state in a court of competent jurisdiction to enforce the unclaimed property laws of the other state against a holder in this state or property laws of the other state against a holder in this state of property subject to escheat or a claim of abandonment by the other state. An action may be brought under this subsection only if the other state has agreed to pay expenses incurred by the attorney general of this state in bringing the action.

The department may request that the attorney general of another state, or another person, bring an action to enforce this chapter in the other state in the name of the department. This state shall pay all expenses including attorney fees in an action under this subsection. The department may agree to pay the person bringing the action attorney fees based in whole or in part on a percentage of the value of property recovered in the action. Expenses paid under this subsection may not be deducted from the amount that is subject to a claim by the owner under AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.430

.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Sec. 34.45.470.
Interest and penalties.

A person who fails to pay or deliver property within the time prescribed by this chapter may be required to pay to the department interest at the annual rate calculated under AS

43.05.225

on the property or the value of it from the date the property should have been paid or delivered.

A person who fails to pay or deliver property or fails to perform other duties required under this chapter may be required to pay the civil penalties calculated under AS

43.05.220

, on the property, or the value of the property, that the person had a duty to pay, deliver, or report to the department.

A person who intentionally refuses after written demand by the department to pay or deliver property to the department as required under this chapter is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986)